Utah statutes.
63M-1-1214.   Compensation from the Utah fund of funds to the corporation -- Redemption reserve.

(1)  The corporation shall be compensated for its involvement in the Utah fund of funds through the payment of the management fee described in Section 63M-1-1211.

(2) (a)  Any returns in excess of those payable to designated investors shall be deposited in the redemption reserve and held by the corporation as a first priority reserve for the redemption of certificates.

(b)  Any returns received by the corporation from investment of amounts held in the redemption reserve shall be added to the redemption reserve until it has reached a total of $300,000,000.

(c)  If at the end of a calendar year the redemption reserve exceeds the $300,000,000 limitation referred to in Subsection (2)(b), the corporation shall reinvest the excess in the Utah fund of funds.

(3)  Funds held by the corporation in the redemption reserve shall be invested in accordance with Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.

